Rhode Island statutes. Title 2 Agriculture and Forestry
Chapter 2 Agricultural Experiment Station

2-2-1.
Assent to federal grant.

The general assembly assents to and accepts the provisions of an act passed by the sixty-eighth congress entitled “An act to authorize the more complete endowment of agricultural experiment stations, and for other purposes”.

History of Section. P.L. 1925, ch. 619, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 203, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

2-2-1

.

2-2-2.
Annual report to governor.

It shall be the duty of the experiment station at the University of Rhode Island, on or before the first day of February, annually, to make a full and detailed report of its operations to the governor, including a statement of its receipts and expenditures
for the fiscal year ending on the thirtieth (30th) day of November in the year next preceding.

History of Section. P.L. 1925, ch. 619, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 203, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2686, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

2-2-2

.